Vermont statutes. Title 11B Nonprofit Corporations
Subchapter 2. Meetings and Action of the Board

§ 8.20.
Regular and special meetings.

If the time and place of a directors’ meeting is fixed by the bylaws or the board, the meeting is a regular meeting. All other meetings are special meetings.

A board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or outside this State.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, a board may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication, including an electronic, telecommunications, and video- or audio-conferencing conference telephone call, by which all directors participating may simultaneously or sequentially communicate with each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997; amended

2009, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. April 15, 2010;

2011, No. 52

, § 19, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 8.21.
Action without meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, action required or permitted by this title to be taken at a board of directors’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members of the board. Each action must be evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each director, and included in the minutes filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken.

Action taken under this section is effective when the last director signs the consent, unless the consent specifies a different effective date.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 8.22.
Call and notice of meetings.

Unless the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or subsection (c) of this section provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board may be held without notice of the date, time, place, or purpose of the meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or subsection (c) of this section provide otherwise, special meetings of the board must be preceded by at least two business days’ notice to each director of the date, time, and place of the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

In corporations without members, any board action to remove a director or to approve a matter which would require approval by the members if the corporation had members, shall not be valid unless each director is given at least seven days’ written notice that the matter will be voted upon at a directors’ meeting or unless notice is waived pursuant to section 8.23 of this title.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws otherwise provide, the presiding officer of the board, the president, or 20 percent of the directors then in office may call and give notice of a meeting of the board.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 8.23.
Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice required by this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the waiver must be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or the corporate records.

A director’s attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the meeting unless the director, upon arriving at the meeting or prior to the vote on a matter not noticed in conformity with this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws, objects to lack of notice and does not thereafter vote for or assent to the objected to action.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 8.24.
Quorum and voting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require a greater number, a quorum of a board of directors consists of:

a majority of the fixed number of directors if the corporation has a fixed board size; or

a majority of the number of directors prescribed, or if no number is prescribed the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if the corporation has a variable-range size board.

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors unless this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to the action taken unless:

the director objects at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon the director’s arrival) to holding it or transacting business at the meeting;

the director’s dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

the director delivers written notice of the director’s dissent or abstention to the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 8.25.
Committees of the board.

Unless prohibited or limited by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint members of the board to serve on them. Each committee shall have two or more members, who serve at the pleasure of the board of directors.

The creation of a committee and appointment of members to it must be approved by the greater of:

a majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

the number of directors required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws to take action under section 8.24 of this title.

Sections 8.20 through 8.24 of this title, which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board of directors, apply to committees and their members as well.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, each committee may exercise the authority of the board of directors under section 8.01 of this title.

A committee of the board may not, however:

authorize distributions;

approve or recommend to members dissolution, merger, or the sale, pledge, or transfer of all or substantially all of the corporation’s assets;

elect, appoint, or remove directors or fill vacancies on the board or on any of its committees; or

adopt, amend, or repeal the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in section 8.30 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.